California, session 20252026, SB1186.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 102635 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102635. (a) A new birth certificate shall be established by the State Registrar within 11 weeks upon receipt of either of the following:(1) A report of adoption from any court of record that has jurisdiction of the child in this state, another state, the District of Columbia, in any territory of the United States, or in any foreign country, for any child born in California and whose certificate of birth is on file in the office of the State Registrar.(2) A readoption order issued pursuant to Section 8919 of the Family Code.(b) If the State Registrar determines that a report of adoption or readoption order is incomplete, the State Registrar shall notify the court that issued the report of adoption or readoption order order, or the applicant as the State Registrar deems necessary, within 14 weeks to request the missing required documentation. The State Registrar shall establish a new birth certificate within 11 weeks of receipt of the required documentation.